District of Columbia statutes.
49-308

Appointments to grade of 2nd lieutenant.

All appointments to the grade of 2nd lieutenant shall be from the enlisted men, under regulations prescribed by the Commanding General, and subject to the examination required by law.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 775, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 630, ch. 146, § 16

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-308.
1973 Ed., § 39-209.